en: Ball flask, Roll-on bottle
de: Deoroller, Deo-Roller, Roll-on, Roll-on-Flasche, Kugelflasche
es: Frascos de bola, Botella roll-on
fr: Flacon à bille, Roll
it: flacone a sfera, flacone roll-on
nl: Balflacon, Roll-on fles

en: Basket, baskets
bg: Кошница, кошници
de: Korb, Körbchen
fr: Panier, paniers
nl: Mand, manden

en: Syringe, syringes
bg: Спринцовка, спринцовки
de: Spritze
es: Jeringa, jeringas
fr: Seringue, seringues
it: Siringa, siringhe
nl: Spuit, spuiten

en: Wings, Hygiene wings
fr: Ailettes

en: bucket, buckets
af: emmer
ar: دلو
as: বাল্টি
az: çanaq
be: вядро
bg: кофа, кофи
br: sailh
ca: galleda, cubell
cs: kýbl
cy: bwced
da: spand
de: Eimer
el: κουβάς
eo: sitelo
es: cubo, balde
et: pang, ämber
fa: سطل
fi: sanko, ämpäri
fo: spann
fr: seau, seaux
fy: amer
ga: buicéad
he: דלי
hi: बाल्टी
hu: veder, vödör
hy: դույլ
ia: situla
id: ember
is: fata
it: secchio
ja: バケツ
ko: 버킷
lb: Eemer
lt: kibiras
mt: barmil
nl: emmer, emmers
nn: bytte, bøtte, spann
no: bøtte, spann
pl: wiadro
pt: balde
ro: galeata
ru: ведро
sk: vedro
sl: vedro
sq: kovë
sv: hink, spann, ämbar
sw: ndoo
te: బక్కెటు, బక్కెట్టు, బొక్కెన
tr: kova
vo: böket
zh: 水桶

en: small bucket
da: lille spand
nl: emmertje
pl: wiaderko

en: Dish, dishes
de: Servierplatte
fr: Plat, plats, Plat, Plat (Bol - Saladier - Terrine - …)

en: salad bowl, salad bowls
de: Salatschüssel, Salatschüsseln
es: ensaladera, ensaladeras
fr: saladier, saladiers
it: insalatiera, insalatiere

en: Terrine pot, terrine pots
de: Terrine
es: Tarrina, tarrinas
fr: Terrine, terrines

en: Barrel, barrels, drum, drums, keg, kegs
de: Fass, Fässer, Trommel, Trommeln, Keg, Kegs
es: Barril, barriles, tambor, tambores, barrilito, barrilitos
fr: Tonneau, tonneaux, tonnelet, tonnelets
it: Barile, barili, botte, botti, fusto, fusti
nl: Vat, vaten, drum, drums, keg, kegs
pt: Barril, barris, tambor, tambores, barrilinho, barrilinhos

en: Bubble wrap
ar: غلاف فقاعي
az: Köpüklü qablaşdırma
bg: Фолио с мехурчета
bn: বাবলWrap
ca: Embolcall de bombolles
cs: Bublinková fólie
da: Bobleplast
de: Luftpolsterfolie
el: Αεροπλάστ
eo: Bobelplasto
es: Plástico de burbujas
et: Mullkile
fa: بسته بندی حبابدار
fi: Kuplamuovi
fr: Film à bulles
he: ניילון בועות
hi: बबल रैप
hr: Folija s mjehurićima
hu: Buborékfólia
id: Bungkus gelembung
it: Pluriball
ja: 気泡緩衝材
ko: 버블 랩
lt: Burbulinė plėvelė
lv: Burbuļplēve
ms: Balut gelembung
nl: Bubbeltjesfilm
no: Bobleplast
pl: Folia bąbelkowa
pt: Plástico bolha
ro: Folie cu bule
ru: Пузырчатая плёнка
sk: Bublinková fólia
sl: Mehurčkasta folija
sq: Mbështjellës me flluska
sr: Мехураста фолија
sv: Bubbelplast
th: บับเบิ้ลแรป
tr: Balonlu ambalaj
uk: Повітряно-пухирчаста плівка
vi: Giấy gói bong bóng
zh: 气泡膜

xx: cellophane
de: Cellophan
nl: cellofaan

en: Cartridge, cartridges
de: Kartusche, Patrone
es: cartucho, cartuchos
fr: Cartouche, cartouches
it: cartuccia, cartucce
nl: Cartridge, cartridges

en: drinking straw, straw, straws
be: саломінка
bg: cламка, сламки
bo: སོག་མ་པི་པི
ca: palla
cs: slámka
cy: gwelltyn
da: sugerør
de: Trinkhalm, Strohhalm
el: καλαμάκι
eo: trinkŝalmo
es: pajilla
et: joogikõrs
fa: نی نوشیدنی
fi: pilli
fo: súgvirør
fr: paille, pailles
ga: sop
gd: sràbh
he: קש
ht: chalimo
hu: szívószál
hy: ձողիկ
id: sedotan
is: drykkjarrör
it: cannuccia
ja: ストロー
ka: საწრუპავი
km: បំពង់បឺត
ko: 빨대
lb: Stréihallem
lo: ຫລອດດູດນ້ຳ
lt: šiaudelis
lv: salmiņš
mk: сламка
mn: соруул
mo: ngongo
ms: penyedut minuman
nl: rietje, rietjes
nn: sugerøyr
no: sugerør
pl: słomka
pt: canudo
ro: pai
ru: соломинка
sh: slamka, сламка
sk: slamka
sl: slamica
sq: biule
sv: sugrör
th: หลอด
tl: halusan
tr: kamış
uk: соломинка
vi: ống hút
wa: paye
yi: שטרוי
zh: 吸管

en: Filling
af: Stopsel
bg: пълнеж
da: fyldning
de: Füllmaterial, Polstermaterial
el: γέμιση
eo: remburaĵo
es: relleno, farsa
fi: täyte
gl: recheo
nl: Opvulmateriaal
pl: wypełnienie
pt: enchimento
ru: наполнение
sk: výplň
th: ไส้
zh: 填充

en: Inlay
de: Einleger
nl: Inlay

en: Brochure
de: Broschüre, Faltblatt
es: Folleto, Prospecto
fr: Brochure
nl: Folder
sv: Broschyr

en: spout, pouring spout, pour spout
az: lülək
bg: чучур
ca: broc
cs: hubice
de: Tülle
es: pico
fa: چرنه
fi: nokka
fo: tútur
fr: verseur, bec verseur
gl: cano
hy: ծորակ
it: beccuccio
ja: 噴出口
nl: tuit, schenktuit
pl: dzióbek
pt: bico
ru: носик
sv: pip
tr: uç
zh: 嘴子

en: Pouring cap
ar: غطاء صب
az: tökmə qapağı
bg: Капачка за наливане
ca: Tapa abocadora
cs: Nalévací víčko
da: Hældetud
de: Ausgießer, Ausgießkappe
el: Καπάκι έκχυσης
es: Tapa vertedora
et: Valamiskork
fa: درب ریختن
fi: Kaatonuppi
fr: Bouchon verseur
he: מכסה מזיגה
hi: उँडेलने वाला ढक्कन
hr: Poklopac za izlijevanje
hu: Öntőfedél
id: Tutup penuang
it: Tappo versatore
ja: 注ぎ口キャップ
ko: 붓는 뚜껑
lt: Pilamas dangtelis
nl: Schroefdop met schenktuit
pl: Korek do nalewania
pt: Tampa de despejo
ro: Capac de turnare
ru: Носик для наливания
sk: Nalievanie viečka
sq: Kapaku i derdhjes
sv: Hällkork
th: ฝาเท
tr: Dökme kapağı
uk: Кришка для наливання
zh: 倒口盖

en: Special cap
de: Spezialverschluss, Dosierverschluss
fr: Bouchon spécial, Pistolet / Pompe / Diffuseur / Robinet / Bouchon Technique